test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-looqtshwz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - lǭʼtšõz: # Noun 185 'eng brome grass /est luste/fin' - full paradigm
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Nom: [lǭʼtšõz, lǭtšõz]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Gen: [lǭʼtšõ, lǭtšõ]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Par: [lǭʼtšõzt, lǭtšõzt]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Dat: [lǭʼtšõn, lǭtšõn]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Ins: [lǭʼtšõks, lǭtšõks]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Ill: [lǭʼtšõ, lǭʼtšõz, lǭtšõ, lǭtšõz]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Sg+Ela: [lǭʼtšõst, lǭtšõst]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Nom: [lǭʼtšõd, lǭtšõd]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Gen: [lǭʼtšõd, lǭtšõd]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Par: [lǭʼtšidi, lǭtšidi]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Dat: [lǭʼtšõdõn, lǭtšõdõn]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Ins: [lǭʼtšõdõks, lǭtšõdõks]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Ill: [lǭʼtšiz, lǭtšiz]
     lǭʼtšõz+N+Pl+Ela: [lǭʼtšist, lǭtšist]
